de: Shapewear-Unterstützungsgrad: Stufe 1; Stufe 2; Stufe 3; Stufe 4; Stufe 5; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Ниво на поддръжка на оформящо облекло: Ниво 1; Ниво 2; Ниво 3; Ниво 4; Ниво 5; Други
it: Livello di supporto dell’indumento modellante: Livello 1; Livello 2; Livello 3; Livello 4; Livello 5; Altro
ja: 補正下着のサポートレベル: レベル1; レベル2; レベル3; レベル4; レベル5; その他
pl: Poziom wsparcia bielizny modelującej: Poziom 1; Poziom 2; Poziom 3; Poziom 4; Poziom 5; Inne
sv: Supportnivå för formgivande plagg: Nivå 1; Nivå 2; Nivå 3; Nivå 4; Nivå 5; Övrigt
hu: Alakformáló ruházati cikkek támogatási szintje: 1. szintű; 2. szintű; 3. szintű; 4. szintű; 5. szintű; Egyéb
es: Nivel de soporte de la faja: Nivel 1; Nivel 2; Nivel 3; Nivel 4; Nivel 5; Otros
fi: Muotoilevien alusasujen tukitaso: Taso 1; Taso 2; Taso 3; Taso 4; Taso 5; Muu
sk-SK: Úroveň podpory tvarovacieho oblečenia: Úroveň 1; Úroveň 2; Úroveň 3; Úroveň 4; Úroveň 5; Iné
vi: Mức nâng ngực định hình: Cấp độ 1; Cấp độ 2; Cấp độ 3; Cấp độ 4; Cấp độ 5; Khác
el: Επίπεδο στήριξης shapewear: Επιπέδου 1; Επιπέδου 2; Επιπέδου 3; Επιπέδου 4; Επιπέδου 5; Άλλο
th: ระดับการรองรับของชุดกระชับสัดส่วน: ระดับ 1; ระดับ 2; ระดับ 3; ระดับ 4; ระดับ 5; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Formuojančių apatinių kompresijos lygis: 1 lygis; 2 lygis; 3 lygis; 4 lygis; 5 lygis; Kita
da: Shapewear-støtteniveau: Niveau 1; Niveau 2; Niveau 3; Niveau 4; Niveau 5; Andet
cs: Úroveň opory tvarovacího prádla: Úroveň 1; Úroveň 2; Úroveň 3; Úroveň 4; Úroveň 5; Jiné
en: Shapewear support level: Level 1; Level 2; Level 3; Level 4; Level 5; Other
ro-RO: Nivel de suport lenjerie modelatoare: Nivelul 1; Nivelul 2; Nivelul 3; Nivelul 4; Nivelul 5; Altele
pt-BR: Nível de suporte da cinta modeladora: Nível 1; Nível 2; Nível 3; Nível 4; Nível 5; Outro
ko: 쉐이프웨어 지지력 수준: 1단계; 2단계; 3단계; 4단계; 5단계; 기타
tr: Şekillendirici kıyafet destek seviyesi: Seviye; Seviye; Seviye; Seviye; Seviye; Diğer
zh-TW: 塑身衣支撐程度: 1 級; 2 級; 3 級; 4 級; 5 級; 其他
hr-HR: Razina potpore odjeće za oblikovanje: Razina 1; Razina 2; Razina 3; Razina 4; Razina 5; Ostalo
ru: Уровень поддержки корректирующего белья: Уровень 1; Уровень 2; Уровень 3; Уровень 4; Уровень 5; Другой
nb: Støttenivå for shapewear: Nivå 1; Nivå 2; Nivå 3; Nivå 4; Nivå 5; Annet
fr: Niveau de maintien des sous-vêtements gainants: Niveau 1; Niveau 2; Niveau 3; Niveau 4; Niveau 5; Autre
pt-PT: Nível de suporte de vestuário modelador: Nível 1; Nível 2; Nível 3; Nível 4; Nível 5; Outro
sl-SI: Raven podpore oblačil za oblikovanje: 1. stopnja; 2. stopnja; 3. stopnja; 4. stopnja; 5. stopnja; Drugo
nl: Ondersteuningsniveau shapewear: Niveau 1; Niveau 2; Niveau 3; Niveau 4; Niveau 5; Andere
zh-CN: 塑身内衣支撑度: 1 级; 2 级; 3 级; 4 级; 5 级; 其他